Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,171
Fraud; penalty.

Any person who registers or causes to be registered any motor vehicle or trailer in the name of any person other than the owner thereof, who gives a false or fictitious name or false or fictitious residential and mailing address of the registrant, or who gives false information pursuant to section 60-386 in any application for registration of a motor vehicle or trailer shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 171.